District of Columbia statutes.
1-625.01

Hatch Act retention.

The provisions of subchapter III of Chapter 73 of Title 5 of the United States Code, affecting political activities of employees of the District of Columbia, shall remain effective.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2512, 25 DCR 5740
renumbered § 2501, Aug. 1, 1979, D.C. Law 3-14, § 2(c), 25 DCR 10565
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-626.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-355.1.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of D.C. Law 18-335, § 8, see § 2(h) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-4, May 18, 2013, 60 DCR 4624, 20 DCSTAT 1268).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 18-335, § 8, see § 2(h) of the Prohibition on Government Employee Engagement in Political Activity Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-25, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3986, 20 DCSTAT 485).

Section 8(a) of D.C. Law 18-335, codified as § 1-1171.01(a), provided that Law 18-18-335 shall apply upon enactment by the Congress of an act excluding the District of Columbia from coverage of 5 U.S.C. §§ 7321 through 7326 (Hatch Act).

Section 8(b) of D.C. Law 18-335 codified as § 1-1171.01(b), provided that this act shall apply upon inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.

Congress enacted and the President signed Public Law 112-230 on December 28, 2012, excluding the District of Columbia from the coverage of 5 U.S.C. §§ 7321 through 7326 (Hatch Act).